Hawaii statutes.
[§226-64] Hawaii interagency council
for transit-oriented development[;] membership. (a) The Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development shall be composed of the
following members:

(1) Director of the office of planning, who shall
serve as co-chair;

(2) Executive director of the Hawaii housing finance
and development corporation, who shall serve as co-chair;

(3) Chief of staff, office of the governor;

(4) Chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources;

(5) Director of transportation;

(6) Comptroller;

(7) Director of health;

(8) Director of human services;

(9) Director of public safety;

(10) Chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission;

(11) Chairperson of the stadium authority;

(12) President of the University of Hawaii;

(13) Superintendent of education;

(14) Executive director of the Hawaii community
development authority;

(15) Executive director of the Hawaii public housing
authority;

(16) One member of the house of representatives to be
designated by the speaker of the house of representatives; provided that the
speaker of the house of representatives may designate a second member of the
house of representatives to serve as an alternate;

(17) One member of the senate to be designated by the
president of the senate; provided that the president of the senate may
designate a second member of the senate to serve as an alternate;

(18) The mayor of each county;

(19) A representative of the Honolulu field office of
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, who shall be
requested to serve on a nonvoting ex officio basis by the governor;

(20) A representative of the business community, to be
designated by the governor;

(21) A representative of the community who is a
housing advocate, to be designated by the governor; and

(22) A representative of the community with experience
in housing and real estate development, to be designated by the governor.

(b) The nongovernmental members of the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (a)(16)
and (17), if a member of the Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented
development is unable to attend a meeting, that member may appoint a designee
to attend and to act on the member's behalf during the meeting. [L 2016, c 130,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next